Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2255XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 69 Section 1. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. a. A booking photograph. 3 Nothwithstanding any other provision of this section, a booking 4 photograph may be released, published, or disseminated for any 5 of the following reasons: 6 (1) A court has determined that the person in the booking 7 photograph is a fugitive and that the release and publication 8 of the booking photograph will assist in apprehending the 9 person. 10 (2) A court has determined that the person in the booking 11 photograph is an imminent threat to an individual or to public 12 safety and that the release and publication of the booking 13 photograph will assist in reducing or eliminating the threat. 14 (3) The person in the booking photograph has been convicted 15 of a class âAâ or class âBâ felony not involving a controlled 16 substance. 17 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbooking photographâ 18 means a photograph or still, nonvideo image of a person 19 generated by a law enforcement agency for identification 20 purposes after an arrest or while the person is in the custody 21 of the law enforcement agency. 22 c. This subsection shall not apply to a law enforcement 23 agencyâs confidential dissemination of a booking photograph to 24 other law enforcement agencies in the performance of official 25 duties. 26 d. For purposes of this subsection, âconvictionâ does not 27 include a deferred judgment unless the deferred judgment was 28 subsequently revoked by the court and judgment was pronounced 29 and a sentence was imposed. 30